Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 29 Textile Processors’ Liens

34-29-1.
Definitions.

The terms used in this chapter shall be construed as follows, unless other meaning is clearly apparent from the language or context, or unless such construction is inconsistent with the manifest intention of the legislature:

“Debtor” means all persons, partnerships, and corporations who may be indebted to a “processor” for work and labor performed and materials furnished in and about the business of spinning, throwing, manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, weighting, printing, finishing, dressing or scraping of linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silk, yarns or goods, skins, pelts, furs, or hides or goods of which linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silk, skins, pelts, furs, or hides form a component part.

“Owner” means all persons, partnerships, and corporations having title to the property herein described, either at law or in equity, or having a lien or encumbrance on the same or having any interest whatsoever in the same, excepting the lien of the processor herein created.

“Processor” means all persons, partnerships, and corporations engaged or that may be engaged in the business of spinning, throwing, manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, weighting, printing, finishing, dressing, or scraping, or otherwise treating or processing of linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silks, yarns, or goods, skins, pelts, furs, or hides, or goods of which linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silk, skins, pelts, furs, or hides form a component part.

“Property” means linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silk, yarn or goods, skins, pelts, furs, or hides, or goods of which linen, cotton, wool, silk, artificial silk, skins, pelts, furs, or hides form a component part.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-1

.

34-29-2.
Lien on textiles for processing.

All processors shall be entitled to a lien upon the property of others which may come or may have come into their possession, for the entire indebtedness of the persons, partnership, or corporation for whose account, and to create which indebtedness work and labor was performed or materials furnished in and about the spinning, throwing, manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, weighting, printing, finishing, dressing, or scraping or otherwise treating or processing, or shipping, trucking, and storing of the property for the debtor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-2

.

34-29-3.
Priority of lien over owner’s interest.

The lien created hereby shall be paramount to the title, lien, interest, or incumbrance of any owner or owners, as herein defined, unless the owner or owners shall have notified the processor by registered or certified mail of the interest of the owner or owners prior to the time when the processor shall commence to perform work or labor or to furnish materials in and about the activities set forth in §

34-29-2

and prior to the time that any lien on the goods shall have arisen by virtue of the provisions of this chapter; and this paramount right of the processor shall not be surrendered or waived excepting by express written agreement between the parties involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 5; P.L. 1956, ch. 3780, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-3

.

34-29-4.
Lien unimpaired by judgment or taking of bill or note for debt.

The lien shall not be waived, merged, suspended, or impaired by the recovery of any judgment or the taking of any bill or note for the money due for such work, labor, or materials, and such lien may be enforced as though the judgment had not been recovered or the bill or note taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-4

.

34-29-5.
Sale of goods — Notice — Disposition of proceeds.

When any processor may have a lien upon the goods and property of others that may have come into their possession, and the amount due shall remain due and unpaid either in whole or in part, for two (2) months after the lien becomes due and payable, it shall be lawful for the processor to expose the goods and property for sale, and sell at public auction, upon notice of sale being first published for two (2) weeks at least once in each week, preceding the day of sale, in some newspaper published in the county in which the goods or property are located, and a copy of the printed notice being mailed to the owner or owners, if known, at least five (5) days before the day of sale, if their post office addresses can be ascertained; and the proceeds of the sale shall be applied to the payment of the lien and the expenses of the sale; and no more of the goods or property shall be sold, if easily separated or divided, than shall be necessary, as near as may be, to pay the lien and expenses, and the balance of the proceeds of sale of the goods or property, if any, shall be paid to those entitled thereto. Nothing in this section shall be construed to be in derogation of the right of the lienor to enforce the lien by any other lawful procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-5

.

34-29-6.
Contractual liens.

The lien hereby created is in addition to any lien created by contract. Any contractual lien may be enforced by the same procedure as is provided in this chapter for the statutory lien, insofar as the contract does not provide otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-6

.

34-29-7.
Severability.

In case, for any reason, any section, part of section, clause or provision of this chapter shall be questioned in any court or determined to be unconstitutional or invalid, the clause or provision shall not in any way affect any other section, part of section, clause or provision of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1354, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 446, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-29-7

.